Maine, session 132, LD324.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 20-A MRSA §253, sub-§10 is enacted to read:
10. Funding for educational programs and opportunities. The commissioner may
raise and expend private funds to support a fund established for specific educational
programs and opportunities.
Sec. 2. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
EDUCATION, DEPARTMENT OF
Innovative Teaching and Learning Z394
Initiative: Provides ongoing funds for an early literacy grant program as well as for grant
programming related to the implementation of best practices for mathematics instruction
in schools.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $500 $500
Page 1 - 132LR0912(06)